Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 2.1. Virginia State Parks Foundation.

§§ 10.1-218 through 10.1-225.

Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 79 and 89.

Cross references.

For funds designated for state parks, see §

10.1-202

.

For Board of Conservation and Recreation, see §

10.1-105

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

10.1-218

through 10.1-225, pertaining to the Virginia State Parks Foundation, were derived from:

10.1-218

:

1992, c. 775; 2000, cc. 21, 294.

10.1-219:

1992, c. 775.

10.1-220:

1992, c. 775.

10.1-221:

1992, c. 775.

10.1-222:

1992, c. 775.

10.1-223:

1992, c. 775.

10.1-224:

1992, c. 775; 1994, c. 205.

10.1-225:

1992, c. 775.